Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 10 Children and Adolescents with Severe Emotional Problems

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, this article was renumbered as Article 10, and its sections renumbered as
Code Sections 49-5-220 to
49-5-227, as another Article 8 was enacted in 1990.

49-5-220.
Legislative findings and intent; State Plan for the Coordinated System of Care for severely emotionally disturbed children or adolescents.

The General Assembly declares its intention and desire to:

Ensure a comprehensive mental health program consisting of early identification, prevention, and early intervention for every child in Georgia;

Preserve the sanctity of the family unit;

Prevent the unnecessary removal of children and adolescents with a severe emotional disturbance from their homes;

Prevent the unnecessary placement of these children out of state;

Bring those children home who through use of public funds are inappropriately placed out of state; and

Develop a coordinated system of care so that children and adolescents with a severe emotional disturbance and their families will receive appropriate educational, nonresidential and residential mental health services, and support services, as prescribed in an individualized plan.

In recognition of the fact that services to these children are provided by several different agencies, each having a different philosophy, a different mandate, and a different source of funding, the General Assembly intends that the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities shall have the primary responsibility for planning, developing, and implementing the coordinated system of care for severely emotionally disturbed children. Further, it recognizes that to enable severely emotionally disturbed children to develop appropriate behaviors and demonstrate academic and vocational skills, it is necessary that the Department of Education provide appropriate education in accordance with P.L. 94-142 and that the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities provide mental health treatment.

Further, in recognition that only a portion of the children needing services are receiving them and in recognition that not all the services that comprise a coordinated system of care are currently in existence or do not exist in adequate numbers, the General Assembly intends that the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities and the Department of Education jointly develop and implement a State Plan for the Coordinated System of Care for severely or emotionally disturbed children or adolescents as defined in paragraph (10) of Code Section 49-5-221.

The commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities and the State School Superintendent shall be responsible for the development and implementation of the state plan.

The commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities shall be responsible for preparing this jointly developed state plan for print or electronic publication and dissemination. The commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities shall also be responsible for preparing for print or electronic publication and dissemination the annual report.

The receipt of services under this article is not intended to be conditioned upon placement of a child in the legal custody, protective supervision, or protection of the Department of Human Services.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-220

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1798, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-23; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 49/SB 46; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-26/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 11/SB 388.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, “49-5-221” was substituted for “49-5-181” in subsection (c) to correspond to the renumbering of this article.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 49, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-2. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

49-5-221.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Annual report” means the report prepared by the commissioner of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities for print or electronic publication and dissemination that includes: the jointly developed State Plan for the Coordinated System of Care; and data on state services to severely emotionally disturbed children or adolescents that are provided either directly by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, the Department of Education, or other involved state agencies, or indirectly through state funding to private agencies.

“Case management” means assuring continuity of services for the child and family, coordinating of services for the child and family, coordinating the interagency assessment of the child and family’s needs, arranging for needed services, and linking various services and agencies.

“Case manager” means the individual identified and assigned the responsibility of ensuring that the child and family obtain necessary services. The case manager shall ensure that evaluations and service provision from multiple agencies are coordinated; that services are based on integrated assessments and evaluations; that adequacy and appropriateness of services is reviewed through quarterly case review staffings; that prompt service delivery is facilitated; that clients are tracked; and that family involvement and input is maintained.

“Coordinated system of care” means a comprehensive array of mental health and other necessary services organized into a coordinated network to meet the multiple and changing needs of severely emotionally disturbed children and adolescents.

“Five-year plan” or “state plan” means the State Plan for the Coordinated System of Care for severely emotionally disturbed children or adolescents.

“Individualized plan” means a written plan for a child or adolescent with a severe emotional disturbance, when appropriate and when eligible, that is based upon the comprehensive multidisciplinary assessment of the individual needs of the child. Such plans shall include, but not be limited to: individualized treatment plans; individualized education plans; individualized placement plans; individualized case plans; individualized family service plans; and individualized employment, service, and rehabilitation plans.

“Local interagency children’s committees” means committees with multiagency representation that are established at the local level to staff cases and review decisions about appropriate treatment or placement of children or adolescents experiencing severe emotional disturbance. Existing troubled children’s committees may serve as local interagency committees.

“Regional plan” means a written strategy developed by local interagency children’s committees based on the principles delineated in Code Section 49-5-222. It contains the same components as the state plan.

“Reintegration plan” means an individualized plan that is designed to provide for the return of the severely emotionally disturbed child or adolescent, who has been placed out of home or out of state to his family or community.

“Severely emotionally disturbed child or adolescent” or “child or adolescent with a severe emotional disturbance” means a person defined as such by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities for mental health services or by the Department of Education for educational purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-221

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1798, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 11/SB 388.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, “49-5-222” was substituted for “49-5-182” in paragraph (8) to correspond to the renumbering of this article.

49-5-222.
Guiding principles for coordinated system of care.

The following ideals shall be the guiding principles for the coordinated system of care:

Services shall be child and family centered and give priority to keeping children with their families. Families shall be fully involved in all aspects of planning and delivery of services; however, no family shall be required to accept services for any family member;

Services shall be community based, with decision-making responsibility and management at the community level;

Services shall be comprehensive, addressing the child’s physical, educational, social, and emotional needs;

Agency resources and services shall be shared and coordinated with written interagency agreements detailing linkages;

Services shall be provided in the least restrictive setting consistent with effective services and as close to the child’s home as appropriate;

Services shall address the unique needs and potential of each child and shall be sufficiently flexible to meet the individual needs of the child and family;

Services shall promote early identification and intervention;

Services shall be culturally and ethnically sensitive;

All legal rights of these children shall be protected; and

The parent or guardian shall be involved in the development of the individualized plan and the delivery of services as defined by the individualized plan.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-222

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1798, § 1.

49-5-223.
Contents of plan; information to be collected; updating of plan; implementation date.

The State Plan for the Coordinated System of Care shall be based upon the projected need for services for a five-year period. The plan shall:

Be based upon the principles delineated in Code Section 49-5-222;

Be based on a case management system with assigned case managers;

Consider nonresidential services including case management, prevention, early identification, assessment, outpatient treatment, home based services, day treatment, and emergency services;

Consider residential services including therapeutic foster care, therapeutic group care, independent living services, residential treatment care, and inpatient hospitalization;

Include mechanisms for handling conflict resolution among the various responsible agencies;

Provide a mechanism to coordinate local resources with all involved state agencies;

Develop specific guidelines for the development and submission of regional interagency plans based on the principles in Code Section 49-5-222;

Provide for the coordination of budget, where possible; for the publication of joint costs of the comprehensive plan; and for a statement on budget recommendations;

Identify gaps in service;

Identify needed policy revisions; and

Recommend priorities for the continuation or development of programs and resources.

In developing the plan, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities and the Department of Education shall collect information on the population currently being served and the population projected to be served.

The plan shall be updated annually.

The first plan shall be put into implementation by July 1, 1991.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-223

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1798, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 49; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-2/HB 228.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, “49-5-222” was substituted for “49-5-182” in paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(7) to correspond to the renumbering of this article.

49-5-224.
Commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities to submit annual report; contents of report.

The
commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities shall submit an annual report to the House and Senate Appropriations Committees, the House Education Committee, the Senate Education and Youth Committee, the House Health and Human Services Committee, the Senate Health and Human Services Committee, the Governor, and the Governor’s Office for Children and Families. The report shall contain a copy of the updated State Plan for the Coordinated System of Care. The report shall also contain the following information on severely and emotionally disturbed children and adolescents receiving services directly or indirectly through the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, the Department of Education, or any other state agency:

The number and ages of children in out-of-state residential facilities;

The number and ages of children in in-state residential facilities;

The number and ages of children in nonresidential treatment;

Annual public funds expended for out-of-state placements, the sources of such funds, and the average cost per child of such out-of-state placement;

Annual public funds expended for in-state residential placements, the sources of such funds, and their average cost per child of such in-state residential placement;

Annual public funds expended for nonresidential treatment, the sources of such funds, and the average cost per child of such nonresidential treatment;

The average length of stay in out-of-state and in-state placements; and

The number and ages of children placed in out-of-home treatment compared to the total number of children in each county of the state.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-224

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1798, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 435, § 17; Ga. L. 2005, p. 48, § 6/HB 309; Ga. L. 2008, p. 568, § 12/HB 1054; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, §§ 9, 14/HB 117; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 3-2, 3-3/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 568, § 1/HB 1054, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act may be cited as the ‘Children and Family Services Strengthening Act of 2008.’ ”

Ga. L. 2008, p. 568, § 2/HB 1054, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that well-intentioned efforts over the years have resulted in the creation of several agencies focused on preventing child abuse and juvenile delinquency, on serving at-risk families and troubled youth, and on promoting the improvement of our state’s child welfare system. The General Assembly further finds that the work of some of these agencies overlaps, and that the at-risk families and troubled children of Georgia will be more efficiently and effectively served by consolidating the Children and Youth Coordinating Council with the Children’s Trust Fund Commission, by placing the functions of the Georgia Child Fatality Review Panel under the supervision of the Child Advocate for the Protection of Children, and by encouraging these consolidated agencies to collaborate to create a consistent vision for serving the needs of our state’s families in need.”

Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 20/HB 117, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act is intended to reflect the current internal organization of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives and is not otherwise intended to change substantive law. In the event of a conflict with any other Act of the 2009 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act.”

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 amendment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 21 (1992).

49-5-225.
Local interagency committees; membership; function of committees.

At least one local interagency committee shall be established for each region of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities whose permanent membership shall include a local representative from each of the following:

The community mental health agency responsible for coordinating children’s services;

The Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of Human Services;

The Department of Juvenile Justice;

The Department of Public Health;

A member of the special education staff of the local education agency; and

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency.

In addition to the permanent members, the local interagency committee reviewing the case of a child or adolescent may include as ad hoc members the special education administrator of the school district serving the child or adolescent, the parents of the child or adolescent, and caseworkers from any involved agencies.

The local interagency committees shall:

Staff cases and review and modify as needed decisions about placement of children and adolescents in out-of-home treatment or placement, monitor each child’s progress, facilitate prompt return to the child’s home when possible, develop a reintegration plan shortly after a child’s admission to a treatment program, review the individual plan for the child or adolescent and amend the plan if necessary, and ensure that services are provided in the least restrictive setting consistent with effective services; and

Be the focal point for the regional plan, if any.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-225

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1798, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 35; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 5; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-24; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-27/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-1/HB 214; Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 3/HB 1146.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Department of Public Health” for “Division of Public Health of the Department of Community Health” in paragraph (a)(4).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency” for “Division of Rehabilitation Services of the Department of Labor” in paragraph (a)(6).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “and” was added to the end of paragraph (a)(5).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

49-5-226.
Placement of children and adolescents out of state for treatment.

Effective July 1, 1993, no children or adolescents with a serious emotional disturbance shall be placed out of state for treatment except after all community resources have been exhausted, all administrative procedures and remedies have been exhausted, or the court has ordered placement or services other than in Georgia.

The cases of all children and adolescents currently placed out of state for treatment of serious emotional problems shall be reviewed to determine the appropriateness of their placement, their readiness to return to their home community, and needed services. All children currently in out-of-state placement shall be brought home no later than July 1, 1995, but only after each child has been given an individual reintegration plan specifying in detail the services, both in terms of human services and in fiscal resources, that shall be available and provided for that child and family. The services for each such child shall be provided from the funds appropriated, including funds now used for out-of-state placement of such child, and all such services shall be provided in the least restrictive environment.

Fiscal incentives, such as flexible funding or decentralized funding, shall be developed for keeping children with their families and developing community based services.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit or prevent a nonprofit agency from contracting with the state to provide any part of the continuum of services, provided that such services shall be provided in the least restrictive environment.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-226

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1798, § 1.

49-5-227.
Governor’s Office for Children and Families to comment on plan for Coordinated System of Care and provide recommendations.

The Governor’s Office for Children and Families shall:

Annually review and comment on the State Plan for the Coordinated System of Care, and submit its comments to the House and Senate Appropriations Committees, the House Education Committee, the Senate Education and Youth Committee, the House Health and Human Services Committee, the Senate Health and Human Services Committee, the Governor, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, and the Department of Education; and

Annually identify and recommend fiscal, policy, and program initiatives and revisions in the state coordinated system of care to the House and Senate Appropriations Committees, the House Education Committee, the Senate Education and Youth Committee, the House Health and Human Services Committee, the Senate Health and Human Services Committee, the Governor, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, and the Department of Education.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-227

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1798, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 435, § 18; Ga. L. 2005, p. 48, § 7/HB 309; Ga. L. 2008, p. 568, § 12/HB 1054; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, §§ 9, 14/HB 117; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-2/HB 228.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, the subsection (a) designation was deleted at the beginning of the present undesignated introductory language.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 568, § 1/HB 1054, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act may be cited as the ‘Children and Family Services Strengthening Act of 2008.’ ”

Ga. L. 2008, p. 568, § 2/HB 1054, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that well-intentioned efforts over the years have resulted in the creation of several agencies focused on preventing child abuse and juvenile delinquency, on serving at-risk families and troubled youth, and on promoting the improvement of our state’s child welfare system. The General Assembly further finds that the work of some of these agencies overlaps, and that the at-risk families and troubled children of Georgia will be more efficiently and effectively served by consolidating the Children and Youth Coordinating Council with the Children’s Trust Fund Commission, by placing the functions of the Georgia Child Fatality Review Panel under the supervision of the Child Advocate for the Protection of Children, and by encouraging these consolidated agencies to collaborate to create a consistent vision for serving the needs of our state’s families in need.”

Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 20/HB 117, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act is intended to reflect the current internal organization of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives and is not otherwise intended to change substantive law. In the event of a conflict with any other Act of the 2009 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act.”

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 amendment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 21 (1992).